Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-347.06
Dismemberment abortion; sections, how construed.

Nothing in sections 28-347 to 28-347.04 shall be construed as creating or recognizing a right to abortion or a right to a particular method of abortion.

Laws 2020, LB814, § 9.